Vermont, session 2025-2026, H528.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4479 is added to read:
§ 4479. IMPROPER DISPOSAL OF A HYPODERMIC NEEDLE OR
SYRINGE IN A SENSITIVE AREA
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Playground” means any park or outdoor recreational area
specifically designed or intended to be used by children that has play
VT LEG #385176 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.528
2026 Page 2 of 2
equipment installed or provides space for children to engage in recreation or
athletics.
(2) “Sensitive area” means the grounds of a playground, beach, park,
child care facility as defined in 33 V.S.A. § 3511, public or independent
school, or regional career technical education center.
(b) A person shall not knowingly or recklessly discard or dispose of a
hypodermic needle or syringe in a sensitive area. A person who violates this
section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than
$1,000.00, or both.
(c) Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to the containment,
treatment, and disposal of medical sharps waste from medical care or first aid
services rendered on the grounds of a child care facility, public or independent
school, or regional career technical education center, nor to the containment,
treatment, and disposal of hypodermic needles or syringes used for
instructional or educational purposes at such places.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385176 v.5